New Jersey, session 221, A1312.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   Any sheriff, constable, State investigator, Special Civil Part court officer, court attendant, or other person authorized to serve a summons, complaint or other judicial or administrative document pursuant to statute or Rules of Court shall be permitted to enter a gated residential community or a multi-unit building or complex where a security guard or other personnel is required to approve or facilitate the entry of visitors and guests beyond the entrance or lobby area of the building to serve such document on a person residing in that community or building. b.    A person guarding or otherwise approving or facilitating the entry of visitors and guests at the entrance of a gated residential community or at the entrance or lobby area of a multi-unit building or complex shall permit any sheriff, constable, State investigator, Special Civil Part court officer, court attendant, or other authorized person to enter the premises to serve a summons, complaint or other judicial or administrative document as authorized under subsection a. of this section if the sheriff, constable, State investigator, Special Civil Part court officer, or other authorized person presents to the guard or other person approving or facilitating the entry of visitors and guests: (1)   photo identification; and (2)   the summons, complaint or other judicial or administrative document. c.     A guard or other person approving or facilitating the entry of visitors and guests who does not comply with subsection b. of this section is guilty of a petty disorderly persons offense. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.